California, session 20252026, SB702.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1305 is added to the Government Code, immediately following Section 1304, to read:1305. (a) Commencing January 1, 2027, the office of the Governor shall maintain on its internet website a list of each state board or commission, as well as the board or commission’s membership list, stated purpose, duties, meeting frequency, internet website, and any vacancies in its membership.(b) (1) On or before January 31, 2028, and annually on January 31 thereafter, the office of the Governor shall create and publish on its internet website a report that contains aggregate demographic information, to the extent available, of appointments by the office of the Governor from January 1 to December 31, inclusive, of the previous year.(2) (A) The aggregate demographic information shall be published in a manner that does not disclose any personal information and ensures the anonymity of the appointed individuals.(B) (i) The aggregate demographic information shall include the following disclaimer: “Reporting of demographic information by appointed individuals is not required. Therefore, this information only includes voluntarily reported data and does not accurately reflect the demographics of all appointments.”(ii) Any organization or individual that utilizes or republishes the aggregate demographic information is encouraged to include the disclaimer described in clause (i).(c) For purposes of this section, “demographic information” includes the voluntarily self-reported ethnicity, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability status, county of residence, party affiliation, and military service of the appointed individuals.SEC. 2. Section 1306 is added to the Government Code, immediately following Section 1305, to read:1306. (a) Commencing January 1, 2027, the Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the Assembly shall maintain on their respective internet websites, or include a link on their respective internet websites to any available resources that contain, a list of each state board or commission that each house has appointment authority over, as well as the board or commission’s membership list, stated purpose, duties, meeting frequency, internet website, and any vacancies in its membership.(b) (1) On or before January 31, 2028, and annually on January 31 thereafter, the Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the Assembly shall publish on their respective internet websites, to the extent available, aggregate demographic information on the respective legislative appointments of each house, made from January 1 to December 31, inclusive, of the previous calendar year.(2) (A) The aggregate demographic information shall only include legislative appointments created by statute, and shall not include ex officio appointments of members of the Senate and the Assembly.(B) The aggregate demographic information shall be published in a manner that does not disclose any personal information and ensures the anonymity of the appointed individuals.(C) (i) The aggregate demographic information shall include the following disclaimer: “Reporting of demographic information by appointed individuals is not required. Therefore, this information only includes voluntarily reported data and does not accurately reflect the demographics of all legislative appointments.”(ii) Any organization or individual that utilizes or republishes the aggregate demographic information is encouraged to include the disclaimer described in clause (i).(c) For purposes of this section, “demographic information” includes the voluntarily self-reported ethnicity, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability status, county of residence, and military service of the appointed individuals.